Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1488.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 605 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 605. Elections on Proposed Constitutional Amendments.--[Unless the General Assembly shall prescribe otherwise] The General Assembly hereby prescribes that with respect to any particular proposed amendment or amendments and the manner and time of submitting to the qualified electors of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 the State any proposed amendment or amendments to the Constitution for the purpose of ascertaining whether the same shall be approved by a majority of those voting thereon, the said amendment or amendments which have heretofore, or which may hereafter be proposed, and which have not been submitted to the qualified electors of the State, shall be submitted to the qualified electors of the State for the purpose aforesaid, at the first [municipal or] general election at which such amendment or amendments may be legally submitted to the electors, which election shall occur at least three months after the date upon which such proposed amendment or amendments shall have been agreed to for the second time by a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly, as provided in Article [Eighteen] Eleven, section one of the Constitution. Said election shall be conducted on said election day in the manner prescribed by the provisions of this act. Such proposed constitutional amendments shall be printed on the ballots or ballot labels in brief form to be determined by the Secretary of the Commonwealth with the approval of the Attorney General.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1488PN1742 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021